Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 1. Qualifications of Voters

§ 2121.
Eligibility of voters.

Any person may register to vote in the town of his or her residence in any election held in a political subdivision of this State in which he or she resides who, on election day:

is a citizen of the United States;

is a resident of the State of Vermont;

has taken the voter’s oath; and

is 18 years of age or more.

Any person meeting the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section who will be 18 years of age on or before the date of a general election may register and vote in the primary election immediately preceding that general election.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 47

, § 11;

2011, No. 66

, § 15, eff. June 1, 2011.

§ 2122.
Residence; special cases; checklist.

A person shall not gain or lose a residence solely by reason of presence or absence while in the service of the State or of the United States; nor while engaged in the navigation of the waters of the State or of the United States or on the high seas; nor while in a hospital, nursing home, or other health care facility; nor while confined in a prison or correctional institution; nor while a member of a veterans’ home; nor while a student at any educational institution; nor while living outside the United States; nor while certified as a participant in the address confidentiality program under 15 V.S.A. chapter 21, subchapter 3.

A person may have his or her name on the checklist only in the town of which the person is a resident. For the purpose of this chapter, “resident” shall mean a person who is domiciled in the town as evidenced by an intent to maintain a principal dwelling place in the town indefinitely and to return there if temporarily absent, coupled with an act or acts consistent with that intent. If a person removes to another town with the intention of remaining there indefinitely, that person shall be considered to have lost residence in the town in which the person originally resided even though the person intends to return at some future time. However, a person shall retain the ability to vote in a town of former residence for a period of 17 days after becoming a resident of a new town. A person may have only one residence at a given time.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 120;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1983, No. 90

, § 4, eff. April 29, 1983;

1985, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1999, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2001;

2001, No. 5

, § 2.

§ 2123.
Residents of unorganized towns and gores.

A resident of an unorganized town, grant, or gore may have his or her name placed upon the checklist in any town that is both in the probate district and in the representative district in which he or she resides, and he or she shall be entitled to vote in all elections in such town except local elections.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2124.
Voter’s oath or affirmation; how administered; application.

The voter’s oath may be administered by:

a person authorized by the law of this State to administer oaths and affirmations;

a member of a board of civil authority;

a commissioned officer of the military service;

any other person qualified to administer oaths and affirmations, within or outside the United States, by the laws of the place in which the oath or affirmation is administered;

any other person over the age of 18; or

an applicant for addition to the checklist who attests to having taken the oath or affirmation under the penalty of perjury.

[Repealed.]

At a minimum, the town clerk shall keep the completed applications for addition to the checklist, or an electronic copy thereof, through the end of the general election cycle that follows the one in which the application was received. The town clerk shall verify, upon request, that a voter has been given the oath or affirmation.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1989, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 47

, § 10;

2001, No. 6

, § 12(b), eff. April 10, 2001;

2007, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 30

, § 1, eff. May 26, 2015;

2015, No. 80

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2017.

§ 2125.
Intermittent residence.

A person, having taken the voter’s oath, who moves from Vermont and obtains voting residence outside the State shall not vote in any election in this State until he or she has once again qualified to vote under this title, except that he or she need not take the voters’ oath again.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1997, No. 47

, § 11.

§ 2126.
Village checklist.

A village clerk shall automatically include on the village checklist the names of all persons living within the village who are on the checklist of the town in which the village is located, except as provided in section 2122 of this title. No separate application or other action on the part of the voter shall be required.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1999, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2001.